District of Columbia statutes.
24-901

Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Committed youth offender” means an individual committed pursuant to this subchapter.

(2)

“Conviction” means the judgment on a verdict or a finding of guilty, a plea of guilty, or a plea of no contest.

(3)

“Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(4)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(5)

“Treatment” means corrective and preventive guidance and training designed to protect the public by correcting the antisocial tendencies of youth offenders.

(6)

“Youth offender” means a person less than 22 years old convicted of a crime other than murder, first degree murder that constitutes an act of terrorism, and second degree murder that constitutes an act of terrorism.

History

Dec. 7, 1985, D.C. Law 6-69, § 2, 32 DCR 4587
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302, § 9(a), 47 DCR 7249
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-194, § 157, 49 DCR 5306

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-801.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-302, in par. (1), deleted “for treatment in the District of Columbia” following “this subchapter”.
D.C. Law 14-194 rewrote par. (6) which had read as follows: “(6) ‘Youth offender’ means a person less than 22 years old convicted of a crime other than murder.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(a) of the Sentencing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-410, August 11, 2000, 47 DCR 7271).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 9(a) and 11 of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(a) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(a) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).